Oklahoma, session 2025, SB852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma State


Guard and Militia Revitalization Act of 2025”.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 44 O.S. 2021, Section 41, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 41. The Militia of the State of Oklahoma shall consist


of all able-bodied citizens of the United States and all other able-


bodied persons who are sound of mind, who shall be or shall have


declared their intentions to become citizens of the United States,


who shall be more than seventeen (17) are at least sixteen (16)


years of age and not more than seventy (70) years of age, and said


the militia shall be divided into three (3) classes: The National


Guard, the Oklahoma State Guard, and the Unorganized Militia;


provided, that persons in the Unorganized Militia over seventy (70)


years of age and under seventeen (17) years of age shall be exempt


from mandatory service.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 44 O.S. 2021, Section 242, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 242. Such military forces shall be designated as the


“Oklahoma State Guard” and shall be composed of officers


commissioned or assigned, and such able-bodied male citizens of the

Req. No. 582 Page 2


state as shall volunteer for service therein. They shall be


additional to and distinct from the National Guard of the State of


Oklahoma, as defined in Title 32 of the United States Code. They


shall not be required to serve outside the boundaries of the State


of Oklahoma this state.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 44 O.S. 2021, Section 243, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 243. A. The Governor is hereby authorized to shall


prescribe rules and regulations governing the enlistment,


organization, administration, equipment, discipline and discharge of


the personnel of such military forces; to requisition from the


Secretary of Defense such arms and equipment as may be in the


possession of and can be spared by the Department of Defense and to


extend thereto the facilities of state armories, Armed Forces


Reserve Centers, readiness centers, logistics, aviation, and


training facilities, warehouses and their equipment and such other


state premises and property as may be available for the purpose of


drill and instruction. Insofar as applicable the procedure for the


enlistment, organization, pay, maintenance, equipment and


disciplining of such forces shall be in conformity with the law and


the rules and regulations governing and pertaining to the National


Guard; provided, that the officers and enlisted personnel in the


Oklahoma State Guard shall not receive any compensation or monetary


allowances from the state except when:

Req. No. 582 Page 3


1. When activated for state active duty, as defined in Section


801 of this title, by order of the Governor;


2. When attending state-mandated training; or


3. For Oklahoma State Guard county coordinators or state-level,


full-time personnel.


B. The Governor shall appoint a Commandant of the Oklahoma


State Guard and Unorganized Militia (OSGUM Commandant or


“Commandant”) to serve within the Military Department of the State


of Oklahoma and to report to the Adjutant General (TAG).


C. Members of the Oklahoma State Guard shall be considered part


of state military forces as defined in Section 801 of this title and


shall be subject to the Oklahoma Uniform Code of Military Justice.


C. D. When prescribing the rules and regulations governing


enlistment, organization, administration, equipment, discipline and


discharge of the personnel of the Oklahoma State Guard, the Governor


shall issue such rules and regulations in the form of an executive


order or in a series of such orders. An executive order or a series


of such orders prescribing the rules and regulations governing


enlistment, organization, administration, equipment, discipline and


discharge of the personnel of the Oklahoma State Guard shall also be


published by the Adjutant General as a military publication.


E. TAG shall authorize at least four voluntary Multiple Unit


Training Assemblies (MUTA) of Inactive Duty for Training (IDT) per



Req. No. 582 Page 4


month and fifteen (15) days of annual training. Personnel shall be


compensated by the state for attending such trainings.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 251.1 of Title 44, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A unit of the Oklahoma State Guard (OSG) shall be


established in each county of this state that shall operate under


and report to a county coordinator. Members of each county unit of


the Oklahoma State Guard and of the Unorganized Militia shall be


able to immediately respond, if called into service, fully equipped


for infantry or other service within this state.


B. Privately owned semiautomatic firearms may be required for


service for the Oklahoma State Guard or the Unorganized Militia if


such firearms are ordered or mustered for service. Any such firearm


shall be similar to firearms issued by the military forces of the


United States, the National Guard, or the military or police forces


of this state, pursuant to regulation developed by the Military


Department of the State of Oklahoma. Such firearms shall:


1. Be capable of accepting a standard capacity magazine of


greater than ten rounds; and


2. Contain ergonomic features including, but not limited to,


any or all of the following:


a. a pistol grip below the action,


b. an adjustable buttstock,

Req. No. 582 Page 5


c. a threaded barrel capable of accepting a muzzle device


designed to reduce or eliminate harmful noise or flash


signature,


d. a lug capable of accepting a bayonet or other


accessories, or


e. a protective shroud or handguard partially or fully


encircling the barrel to prevent barrel heat injury to


the user.


C. Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in subsection B


of this section, the Adjutant General (TAG) shall promulgate an


additional standard for emergency situations that shall authorize


the use of any safe and operable semiautomatic or other rifle,


pistol, or shotgun that is in common use by military or police


forces.


D. Under orders promulgated by the Governor and the Adjutant


General (TAG), each county coordinator of the Oklahoma State Guard


shall ensure the equipping, training, and readiness to the extent


permitted by local county volunteer staffing and interest, and for


the training and readiness of volunteers drawn from the Unorganized


Militia of this state.


E. 1. The State of Oklahoma shall fund:


a. the position of the county coordinator, and


b. the county OSG unit when activated for state active


duty, as defined in Section 801 of Title 44 of the

Req. No. 582 Page 6


Oklahoma Statutes, by order of the Governor, or when


called to mandatory training.


2. Counties and citizen groups may voluntarily fund personnel,


training, equipment, vehicles, and logistics for their respective


county OSG units in coordination with the Military Department of the


State of Oklahoma, but such OSG units shall remain under the command


of the Department when ordered to service, and any such use of


voluntary funding shall be consistent with orders and regulations of


the Governor pursuant to Section 243 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


F. The Military Department of the State of Oklahoma shall


develop a plan of coordination with county sheriffs and the county’s


respective OSG unit for emergency management.


G. County OSG units shall adhere to the uniform and grooming


standards set forth in Army Regulations AR 670-1.


H. Beginning December 1, 2025, the county election board


secretary of each county shall provide every registered voter with


notice of the opportunity for service in and contact information for


the county OSG unit, and thereafter, upon first-time voter


registration.


I. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or


permit any scheme of licensing, registration, or list of specific


firearms.



Req. No. 582 Page 7


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 251.2 of Title 44, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The sheriff of each county in this state shall solicit


nominees with prior honorable service in the Armed Forces of the


United States or National Guard and who reside within the county, to


serve as the interim Oklahoma State Guard (OSG) county coordinator


for that county. Any person desiring to serve shall provide to the


sheriff for the county of desired service his or her Certificate of


Release or Discharge from Active Duty (Form DD 214) or National


Guard Report of Separation and Record of Service (NGB Form 22) and


most recent evaluation report prior to the expiration of his or her


term of service.


B. No later than November 30, 2025, the sheriff of each county


in this state shall appoint an interim county coordinator. The


appointment must be approved by a majority vote of the board of


county commissioners.


C. The county coordinator shall have the power and duty to


initiate the administration of the county unit of the Oklahoma State


Guard and Unorganized Militia (OSGUM). The county coordinator shall


report to the OSGUM Commandant and to the Adjutant General (TAG),


and such intermediary officers as TAG shall appoint, for ensuring


the readiness of the OSG county unit and training opportunities for


the Unorganized Militia within the county.

Req. No. 582 Page 8


D. No later than January 30, 2026, and by March 1 of every year


thereafter, the Oklahoma National Guard shall provide to county


coordinators a list of persons retired or honorably discharged from


the service of the United States or from the National Guard within


the last forty-eight (48) months, who reside within the county.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 251.3 of Title 44, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma to be


designated the “Oklahoma State Guard Revolving Fund”. The fund


shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,


and shall consist of all monies received by the Department from


appropriations, grants, or private donations provided for the


purposes stated in this section. All monies accruing to the credit


of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended


by the Department for the following purposes:


1. Funding the positions of Oklahoma State Guard county


coordinators; and


2. Making grants to county coordinators to be used for training


of personnel and purchasing of ammunition, weaponry, and other


necessary equipment.


Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by


the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with

Req. No. 582 Page 9


the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-582 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:38 AM







































Req. No. 582 Page 10